Utah statutes.
58-50-4.   License required -- License classifications.

(1)  An individual may not engage in practice as a private probation provider unless licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person qualified for licensure under the provisions of this chapter a license as a private probation provider.



Amended by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

